Hawaii statutes.
§286-233 Notification requirements. (a)
Any driver of a commercial motor vehicle holding a commercial driver's license or
a commercial learner's permit issued by this State who is convicted of
violating any state law or local ordinance relating to motor vehicle traffic
control in any other state, or federal, provincial, territorial, or municipal
laws of Canada or Mexico, other than parking violations, in any type of motor
vehicle, shall notify the examiner of drivers in the manner specified by the
director within thirty days of the date of conviction. Any driver of a
commercial motor vehicle holding a commercial driver's license or a commercial
learner's permit issued by this State, who is convicted of violating any state
law or local ordinance relating to motor vehicle traffic control in this or any
other state, or federal, provincial, territorial, or municipal laws of Canada
or Mexico, other than parking violations, in any type of motor vehicle, shall
notify the person's current employer in writing of the conviction within thirty
days of the date of conviction.

(b) Each commercial driver whose driver's
license or permit is suspended, revoked, or canceled by any state, who loses
the privilege to drive a commercial motor vehicle in any state for any period,
or who is disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle for any period,
shall notify the person's current employer of the suspension, revocation, or
cancellation before the end of the business day following the day the driver
received notice of the suspension, revocation, cancellation, or
disqualification.

(c) The written notice to the examiner of
drivers and current employer as required by subsection (a) shall contain the
following information:

(1) Driver's full name;

(2) Driver's license number;

(3) Date of conviction;

(4) Each specific criminal or other offense, or
serious traffic violation of state or local law relating to motor vehicle
traffic control, of which the person was convicted, and any suspension,
revocation, or cancellation of driving privileges which resulted from that
conviction;

(5) Indication whether the violation was in a
commercial motor vehicle;

(6) Location of offense; and

(7) Driver's signature.

(d) Each person who drives a commercial motor
vehicle and applies for employment as a commercial motor vehicle driver shall
provide the employer, at the time of the application, with the following
information for the ten years preceding the date of application:

(1) A list of the names and addresses of the
applicant's previous employers for which the applicant was a driver of a
commercial motor vehicle;

(2) The dates between which the applicant drove for
each employer; and

(3) The reason for leaving each employer.

The applicant shall certify that all information
furnished is true and complete. An employer may require an applicant to
provide additional information. [L 1989, c 320, pt of §2; am L 1990, c 342, §5;
am L 1993, c 268, §4; am L 2013, c 114, §4]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next